Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF27.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1101XS (2) 91 th/ns S.F. 27 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 321.491A Driver improvement 1 information. 2 The department shall include in the electronic database used 3 by the department and law enforcement to access registration, 4 titling, and driverâs license information, details indicating 5 whether a driver has been required by the department or ordered 6 by a court to complete remedial driver improvement action, 7 including any driver improvement education course, following an 8 arrest, citation, conviction, or accident, and if so, whether 9 the driver completed the action. 10 Sec. 2. Section 602.8102, Code 2025, is amended by adding 11 the following new subsection: 12 NEW SUBSECTION . 52. If a person is ordered to complete 13 remedial driver improvement action, including any driver 14 improvement education course, the clerk shall forward a copy 15 of the order to the department of transportation within ten 16 days of the order. The clerk shall notify the department of 17 transportation that the person completed such action within ten 18 days of receiving confirmation that the person completed the 19 action. 20